Montana, session 2025, HB201.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Paid signature gatherers -- disclosure requirements. (1) A paid signature gatherer, as
defined in 13-27-112, shall verbally disclose their first name, the state in which they legally reside, and their
status as a paid signature gatherer verbally and by wearing a badge stating this information to anyone the paid
signature gatherer approach es about signing a petition to anyone they approach about signing a petition. The
paid signature gatherer shall also wear a badge stating this information, including their full first name and last
initial.
(2) The disclosure provided for in subsection (1) must include the state the paid signature gatherer
legally resides in.
Section 2. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an integral part of Title
13, chapter 27, and the provisions of Title 13, chapter 27, apply to [section 1].
Section 3. Severability. If a part of [this act] is invalid, all valid parts that are severable from the
invalid part remain in effect. If a part of [this act] is invalid in one or more of its applications, the part remains in
effect in all valid applications that are severable from the invalid applications.
Section 4. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 201
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 201, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 201
INTRODUCED BY B. MITCHELL, D. EMRICH, J. FULLER, W. GALT, C. GLIMM, G. HUNTER, W. MCKAMEY,
T. MCGILLVRAY, B. PHALEN, T. TEZAK, J. TREBAS, D. ZOLNIKOV, E. ALBUS, B. BARKER, L. BENNETT,
M. BERTOGLIO, L. BREWSTER, E. BUTTREY, E. BYRNE, C. COCHRAN, J. DARLING, L. DEMING, N.
DURAM, S. ESSMANN, J. ETCHART, T. FALK, P. FIELDER, S. FITZPATRICK, S. GIST, R. GREGG, C.
HINKLE, J. HINKLE, S. KELLY, B. LER, K. LOVE, S. MANESS, B. MERCER, T. MILLETT, R. MINER, V.
MOORE, F. NAVE, A. NICASTRO, N. NICOL, M. NIKOLAKAKOS, G. NIKOLAKAKOS, G. OBLANDER, G.
OVERSTREET, G. PARRY, A. REGIER, C. SCHOMER, L. SCHUBERT, K. SEEKINS-CROWE, T. SHARP, C.
SPRUNGER, E. TILLEMAN, M. VINTON, K. WALSH, Z. WIRTH, K. ZOLNIKOV
AN ACT REQUIRING PAID SIGNATURE GATHERERS TO DISCLOSE THEIR STATUS AND TO PROVIDE
THEIR STATE OF LEGAL RESIDENCE; AND PROVIDING AN IMMEDIATE EFFECTIVE DATE.”